Arkansas, session 2025, SB603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "Emma's Law".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 13, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-13-220. Air ambulance — Recommendation on best destination.
An air ambulance shall contact the Arkansas Trauma System for
recommendation on the best destination to transport a person for trauma
concerns or cases.

/s/C. Tucker



*JMB623*
04-16-2025 08:48:41 JMB623